Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.725

Additional powers of board—Issuance of bonds, investments, transfer of funds, etc.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5195-S.SL) ***

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the University of Washington building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. However, during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

[ 2023 c 474 s 8023; 2021 c 332 s 7027; 2019 c 413 s 7025; 2018 c 2 s 7019; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7025; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7027; 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7020; 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6008; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.725. Prior: 1959 c 193 s 6. Formerly RCW 28.77.545.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2023 c 474: See notes following RCW 28A.320.330.

Effective date—2021 c 332: See note following RCW 43.19.501.

Effective date—2019 c 413: See note following RCW 28B.15.210.

Effective date—2018 c 2: See note following RCW 28B.10.027.

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 3: See note following RCW 43.160.080.

Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 43.34.080.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 48: See note following RCW 39.35B.050.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 43.155.050.